California, session 20252026, SB83.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 11831.5 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:11831.5. (a) An operator of a licensed alcoholism or drug abuse recovery or treatment facility, as defined in Section 11834.02, or a certified alcohol or other drug program shall include on its internet website and intake form paperwork a disclosure that an individual may check the internet website of the State Department of Health Care Services to confirm whether the facility’s license or program’s certification has been placed in probationary status, been subject to a temporary suspension order, been revoked, or the operator has been given a notice of operation in violation of law. The disclosure shall include a link to the department’s internet website that contains the Probationary Status, Temporary Suspension Order, Revoked and Notice of Operation in Violation of Law Program List. The department shall indicate on its internet website containing this list, in a location and font that is easy to see and read, that notices issued to recovery residences, as defined in Section 11833.05, for a violation of Section 11834.30, are not included in this list.(b) A violation of subdivision (a) shall be subject to penalty by the department pursuant to Section 11831.7.(c) The department shall post on its internet website, in a location easily navigable from a link on its main homepage that is prominently located and clearly and conspicuously labeled, an identification and summary of each violation the department has issued for the facilities and programs included on the list described in subdivision (a). A summary of each violation shall include all of the following:(1) Name of the entity or person to whom the department issued the violation.(2) A citation to the relevant statute, regulation, or standard.(3) A summary of the department’s decision to issue the violation.(4) Date the department issued the violation.(5) Any other information the department determines is necessary for the public to recognize the entity or person who received the violation and understand the basis for the violation.(d) The department shall implement this section to protect the public it serves by providing sufficient information regarding those who violate the state laws it administers. The department shall not implement this section by posting information on its internet website that violates privacy rights and protections provided by state or federal law.